Hawaii statutes.
§437D-13 Notice and posting required
concerning motor vehicle laws. Every lessor shall display at all times a
sign or signs in a conspicuous place in the main rental area of all rental
locations, written in plain language and in no less than ten-point type, that
informs the lessee of:

(1) Hawaii's seat belt and child passenger restraint
laws and the prohibition against operating a vehicle under the influence of an
intoxicant and leaving a child unattended in a motor vehicle; and

(2) The existence and location of additional
information concerning the laws relating to seat belts, child passenger
restraints, operating a vehicle under the influence of an intoxicant, and
leaving a child unattended in a motor vehicle. [L 1988, c 251, pt of §2; am L
1990, c 154, §1; am L 2001, c 157, §33; am L 2008, c 170, §4; am L 2009, c 148,
§11]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next